en: Preserved pork liver
fr: Confit de foie de porc

en: Pork liver mousse
fr: Mousse de foie de porc

en: Pork liver mousse superior quality
fr: Mousse de foie de porc supérieure

en: Salt-cured pork ear
fr: Oreille de porc demi-sel

en: Pork rind
fr: Couenne de porc

en: Fried pork rind
es: Cortezas de cerdo
fr: Couennes de porc frites

en: Pork belly with flank removed, pork belly flank off
fr: Poitrine de porc sans mouille, Poitrine de porc cutter

en: Pork shoulders
fr: Epaules de porc
hr: Svinjske lopatice
ja: 豚肩肉

en: Cooked pork shoulder
fr: Epaule de porc cuite

en: Frozen pork shoulders
fr: Epaules de porc surgelées

en: Smoked pork belly
fr: Poitrine de porc fumée

en: Standard rindless and fatless cooked pork shoulder, Cooked pork shoulder standard rind less and fatless
fr: Épaule de porc cuite standard découennée dégraissée

en: Pork roasts
de: Schweinebraten
fr: Rôtis de porc, rôti de porc
hr: Svinjska pečenja
it: Arrosti di maiale

en: Cooked pork roast
fr: Rôti de porc cuit

en: Pork ribs, pork chops, pork ribs
bg: Свински ребърца
de: Schweinerippchen
es: Costillas de cerdo
fi: Porsaan kylkipalat, Porsaan ribsit
fr: Côtes de porc
hr: Svinjska rebarca
it: Costine di maiale, Costolette di maiale, Coste di maiale
lt: Kiaulienos šonkauliukai
nl: Varkenskarbonade
zh: 排骨, 猪排骨

en: Grilled pork chops, Grilled pork ribs
fr: Côtes de porc grillées

en: Pork racks
fr: Carrés de porc

en: Pork belly
de: Schweinebauch
fi: possun maha
fr: Poitrine de porc
hr: Svinjska potrbušina
it: Pancia di maiale
ja: 豚バラ肉
nl: Varkensbuik
zh: 猪肚, 猪肚肉

en: Pancetta, Dried pancetta
de: Pancetta
fr: Pancetta, Poitrine roulée sèche
hr: Panceta
it: Pancetta essiccata
ja: パンチェッタ

en: Arrotolata pancetta
it: Pancetta arrotolata